fr: Utilisation prévue du pneu de tracteur: Champ agricole; Industriel/construction; Pelouse/gazon; Neige/glace; Remorque; Autre
nb: Bruksområde for traktordekk: Jordbruksfelt; Industri/bygg; Plen/torv; Snø/is; Tilhenger; Annet
hr-HR: Primjena gume za traktore: Poljoprivredno polje; Industrija/građevinarstvo; Travnjak; Snijeg/led; Prikolica; Ostalo
sv: Användning för traktordäck: Jordbruksfält; Industri/bygg; Gräsmatta/torv; Snö/is; Trailer; Annat
el: Εφαρμογή ελαστικών τρακτέρ: Γεωργικός τομέας; Βιομηχανία/κατασκευές; Γκαζόν/χλοοτάπητας; Χιόνι/πάγος; Τροχόσπιτο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Uporaba traktorskih pnevmatik: Kmetijsko polje; Industrijska/gradbena; Trava/travnik; Sneg/led; Prikolica; Druga
th: การใช้งานยางรถแทรกเตอร์: พื้นที่เกษตรกรรม; อุตสาหกรรม/ก่อสร้าง; สนามหญ้า/พื้นหญ้า; หิมะ/น้ำแข็ง; รถพ่วง; อื่นๆ
hu: Traktor gumiabroncsok alkalmazása: Mezőgazdasági terület; Ipari/építőipari; Gyep/mező; Hó/jég; Utánfutó; Egyéb
ko: 트랙터 타이어 용도: 농경지; 산업/건설; 잔디 관리; 빙판/설상; 트레일러; 기타
pt-BR: Aplicação do pneu para trator: Campo agrícola; Industrial/construção; Gramado/relva; Neve/gelo; Reboque; Outro
en: Tractor tire application: Agricultural field; Industrial/construction; Lawn/turf; Snow/ice; Trailer; Other
it: Applicazione dei pneumatici da trattore: Campo agricolo; Industriale/edile; Prato/tappeto erboso; Neve/ghiaccio; Rimorchio; Altro
pt-PT: Aplicação do pneu para trator: Campo agrícola; Industrial/construção; Relvado/relva; Neve/gelo; Reboque; Outro
bg-BG: Приложение гума за трактор: Земеделско поле; Промишленост/строителство; Ливада/тревна площ; Сняг/лед; Ремарке; Друго
ja: トラクタータイヤの用途: 農業; 工業/建設; 芝生; 雪/氷; トレーラー; その他
ro-RO: Aplicația anvelopei de tractor: Câmp agricol; Industrial/construcții; Gazon/iarbă; Zăpadă/gheață; Remorcă; Altele
sk-SK: Použitie pneumatík pre traktory: Poľnohospodárstvo; Priemysel/stavebníctvo; Trávnik/trávnaté plochy; Sneh/ľad; Príves; Iné
de: Anwendung des Traktorreifens: Landwirtschaftliches Feld; Industrie/Bauwesen; Rasen/Gras; Schnee/Eis; Anhänger; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 拖拉机轮胎应用: 农田; 工业/建筑; 草坪/草地; 雪地/冰面; 拖车; 其他
cs: Použití traktorové pneumatiky: Zemědělská půda; Průmysl/stavebnictví; Trávník/louka; Sníh/led; Přívěs; Jiné
ru: Назначение тракторной шины: Сельскохозяйственное поле; Промышленность/строительство; Газон/дерн; Снег/лед; Прицеп; Другое
pl: Zastosowanie opon do ciągników: Rolnictwo (pole uprawne); Przemysł / budownictwo; Trawnik / murawa; Śnieg/lód; Przyczepa; Inne
nl: Toepassing tractorband: Landbouwveld; Industrie/bouw; Gazon/grasveld; Sneeuw/ijs; Trailer; Overig
da: Brug af traktordæk: Landbrugsmark; Industri/konstruktion; Græsplæne/tørv; Sne/is; Anhænger; Andet
es: Uso de los neumáticos para tractores: Campo agrícola; Industrial/construcción; Césped/césped; Nieve/hielo; Tráiler; Otros
fi: Traktorin renkaan käyttökohde: Maatalousala; Teollisuus/rakentaminen; Nurmikko/nurmi; Lumi/jää; Traileri; Muu
lt-LT: Traktoriaus padangos paskirtis: Žemės ūkio laukas; Pramonė / statyba; Veja / velėna; Sniegas / ledas; Priekaba; Kita
tr: Traktör lastiği kullanım alanı: Tarım alanı; Endüstriyel/inşaat; Çim/çimen; Kar/buz; Römork; Diğer
vi: Ứng dụng lốp xe máy kéo: Cánh đồng nông nghiệp; Công nghiệp/xây dựng; Bãi cỏ/thảm cỏ; Tuyết/băng; Rơ-moóc; Khác
zh-TW: 拖拉機輪胎應用: 農地; 工業/建築用; 草坪用; 雪地/冰上用; 拖車; 其他